Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.170

Board to inform itself as to each convict—Records from department of corrections.

To assist it in fixing the duration of a convicted person's term of confinement, and in fixing the condition for release from custody on parole, it shall not only be the duty of the board to thoroughly inform itself as to the facts of such convicted person's crime but also to inform itself as thoroughly as possible as to such convict as a personality. The department of corrections and the institutions under its control shall make available to the board on request its case investigations, any file or other record, in order to assist the board in developing information for carrying out the purpose of this section.

[ 1999 c 143 s 28; 1981 c 136 s 40; 1979 c 141 s 5; 1967 c 134 s 13; 1935 c 114 s 3; RRS s 10249-3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.